Utah statutes.
58-70a-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.

Grounds for the following division actions regarding a licensee are under Section 58-1-401:

(1)  refusing to issue a license to an applicant;

(2)  refusing to renew the license of a licensee;

(3)  revoking, suspending, restricting, or placing on probation the license of a licensee;

(4)  issuing a public or private reprimand to a licensee; and

(5)  issuing a cease and desist order.

